Utah statutes.
48-2c-1408.   Approval of merger.
(1)  A plan of merger shall be approved by each entity that is a party to the
merger, as follows:
(a)  In the case of a domestic company, by members holding the interest in
profits required by Section 48-2c-803, or by a greater vote if required by its
articles of organization or operating agreement.
(b)  In the case of an entity other than a domestic company, as provided by
the statutes governing that entity.
(2)  After a merger is authorized, and at any time before articles of merger
are filed, the planned merger may be abandoned, subject to any contractual
rights:
(a)  By a domestic company, in accordance with the procedure set forth in the
plan of merger or, if none is set forth, by vote of members holding 2/3 of the
profit interests in the domestic company.
(b)  By a party to the merger that is not a domestic company, in accordance
with the procedure set forth in the plan of merger or, if none is set forth,
in the manner permitted by the statutes governing that entity.
